Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1264
Local regulation; extent permitted.

The provisions of the State Boat Act and of other applicable laws of this state shall govern the operation, equipment, numbering, and all other matters relating thereto whenever any vessel shall be operated on the waters of this state or when any activity regulated by the act shall take place thereon; but nothing in the act shall be construed to prevent the adoption of any ordinance or local law relating to operation and equipment of vessels the provisions of which are identical to the provisions of the act or rules or regulations issued thereunder, but such ordinances or local laws shall be operative only so long as and to the extent that they continue to be identical to provisions of the State Boat Act or rules or regulations issued thereunder.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 64;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 122.